Maine, session 132, LD380.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §90-B, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. D, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. "Application assistant" means an employee of a state or local agency or of a
nonprofit program that provides counseling, referral, shelter or other specialized
service to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or human trafficking
or to minor victims of kidnapping or that provides services related to legally protected
health care activity who has been designated by the respective agency and trained,
accepted and registered by the secretary to assist individuals in the completion of
program participation applications.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §90-B, sub-§1, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. D, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §90-B, sub-§1, ¶C-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. D, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §90-B, sub-§1, ¶F-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. D, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §90-B, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. D, §5, is further
amended to read:
2. Program established. The Address Confidentiality Program is established to
protect victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or human trafficking; and
minor victims of kidnapping; and reproductive or gender-affirming health care services
practitioners by authorizing the use of designated addresses for such victims and
practitioners. The program is administered by the secretary under the following application
and certification procedures.
A. Upon recommendation of an application assistant, an adult person, a parent or
guardian acting on behalf of a minor or a guardian acting on behalf of an incapacitated
person may apply to the secretary to have a designated address assigned by the
secretary to serve as the person's address or the address of the minor or incapacitated
person.
B. The secretary may approve an application only if it is filed with the office of the
secretary in the manner established by rule and on a form prescribed by the secretary.
A completed application must contain:
(1) The application preparation date, the applicant's signature and the signature
and registration number of the application assistant who assisted the applicant in
applying to be a program participant;
(2) A designation of the secretary as agent for purposes of service of process and
for receipt of first-class mail;
(3) The mailing address where the applicant may be contacted by the secretary or
a designee and the telephone number or numbers where the applicant may be called
by the secretary or the secretary's designee; and
Page 1 - 132LR0675(01)

(4) One or more addresses that the applicant requests not be disclosed for the
reason that disclosure will jeopardize the applicant's safety or increase the risk of
violence to the applicant or members of the applicant's household.
C. Upon receipt of a properly completed application, the secretary may certify the
applicant as a program participant. A program participant is certified for 4 years
following the date of initial certification unless the certification is withdrawn or
invalidated before that date. The secretary shall send notification of lapsing
certification and a reapplication form to a program participant at least 4 weeks prior to
the expiration of the program participant's certification.
D. The secretary shall forward first-class mail to the appropriate program participants.
E. A person who violates this paragraph commits a Class E crime.
(1) An applicant may not file an application knowing that it:
(a) Contains false or incorrect information; or
(b) Falsely claims that disclosure of the applicant's address or mailing address
threatens the safety of the applicant or the applicant's children or the minor or
incapacitated person on whose behalf the application is made.
(2) An application assistant may not assist or participate in the filing of an
application that the application assistant knows:
(a) Contains false or incorrect information; or
(b) Falsely claims that disclosure of the applicant's address or mailing address
threatens the safety of the applicant or the applicant's children or the minor or
incapacitated person on whose behalf the application is made.
Sec. 6. 10 MRSA §8012, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 14 MRSA §402, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. B, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 8. 14 MRSA §402, sub-§2-B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. B, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 9. 14 MRSA §403, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. B, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 10. 14 MRSA §403, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. B, §4, is
further amended to read:
2. Submission of foreign subpoena. Except as provided in subsection 4, when When
a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in the State, the clerk, in accordance
with that court's procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service upon the person to
which the foreign subpoena is directed.
Sec. 11. 14 MRSA §403, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. B, §5, is
repealed.
Sec. 12. 14 MRSA c. 763, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 13. 15 MRSA §203, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. C, §1, is
repealed.
Page 2 - 132LR0675(01)

Sec. 14. 16 MRSA §642, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. C, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 15. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§1, ¶A-2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. F,
§1, is repealed.
Sec. 16. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§1, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. F,
§2, is repealed.
Sec. 17. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§1, ¶G-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. F,
§3, is repealed.
Sec. 18. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§1, ¶G-2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. F,
§4, is repealed.
Sec. 19. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§8, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 648,
Pt. F, §5, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
8. Prohibited disclosure. A health care practitioner, facility or state-designated
statewide health information exchange may not disclose health care information for the
purpose of marketing or sales without written or oral authorization for the disclosure.
Sec. 20. 24 MRSA §2513, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 21. 24-A MRSA §2159-F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E, §3, is further
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§2159-F. Discrimination based solely on provision of reproductive health care
services in medical malpractice insurance based solely on legally protected
health care activity
Sec. 22. 24-A MRSA §2159-F, sub-§1, ¶B, as repealed by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt.
E, §3, is reenacted to read:
B. "Health care professional who provides reproductive health care services" means a
health care professional who provides, authorizes, recommends, aids, assists, refers for
or otherwise participates in an abortion or any other reproductive health care services
provided for the purpose of an abortion performed on an individual.
Sec. 23. 24-A MRSA §2159-F, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§3, is repealed.
Sec. 24. 24-A MRSA §2159-F, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§3, is repealed.
Sec. 25. 24-A MRSA §2159-F, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E, §3,
is further amended to read:
2. Discrimination prohibited. An insurer that provides medical malpractice
insurance in this State may not refuse to issue or renew coverage, cancel or restrict
coverage, impose any sanctions, fines, penalties or rate increases or require the payment of
additional charges by a health care professional who engages in legally protected health
care activity or aids and assists legally protected health care activity provides reproductive
health care services on the sole basis that the health care professional is acting in violation
of another state's law related to legally protected health care activity or aiding and assisting
legally protected health care activity or is subject to an adverse action against the health
Page 3 - 132LR0675(01)

412 care professional's license in another state for a violation of that state's law related to legally
423 protected health care activity or aiding and assisting legally protected health care activity.
Sec. 26. 24-A MRSA §2159-F, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E, §3,
is further amended to read:
3. Action based on adverse action in another state prohibited. An insurer that
provides medical malpractice insurance in this State may not refuse to issue or renew
coverage, cancel or restrict coverage or require the payment of additional charges by a
health care professional who engages in legally protected health care activity or aids and
assists legally protected health care activity provides reproductive health care services as a
result of an adverse action against the health care professional's license in another state if
the adverse action is solely based on a violation of the other state's law related to legally
protected health care activity or aiding and assisting legally protected health care activity
that prohibits abortion and any related reproductive health care services in that state or for
a resident of that state.
Sec. 27. 24-A MRSA §4301-A, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§4, is repealed.
Sec. 28. 24-A MRSA §4301-A, sub-§5-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§5, is repealed.
Sec. 29. 24-A MRSA §4301-A, sub-§8-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§6, is repealed.
Sec. 30. 24-A MRSA §4301-A, sub-§17-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§7, is repealed.
Sec. 31. 24-A MRSA §4303, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§8, is further amended to read:
B. All credentialing decisions, including those granting, denying or withdrawing
credentials, must be in writing. The provider must be provided with all reasons for the
denial of an application for credentialing or the withdrawal of credentials. A
withdrawal of credentials must be treated as a provider termination and is subject to
the requirements of subsections subsection 3‑A and 3‑C.
Sec. 32. 24-A MRSA §4303, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E,
§9, is further amended to read:
A. For the purposes of this section, "to advocate for medically appropriate health care"
means to discuss or recommend a course of treatment, including gender-affirming
health care services and reproductive health care services, to an enrollee; to appeal a
managed care plan's decision to deny payment for a service, including gender-affirming
health care services and reproductive health care services, pursuant to an established
grievance or appeal procedure; or to protest a decision, policy or practice that the
provider, consistent with the degree of learning and skill ordinarily possessed by
reputable providers, reasonably believes impairs the provider's ability to provide
medically appropriate health care, including gender-affirming health care services and
reproductive health care services, to the provider's patients.
Page 4 - 132LR0675(01)

Sec. 33. 24-A MRSA §4303, sub-§3-C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. E, §10,
is repealed.